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DTC C 1786 / 86 Height Select Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This circuit sending the signal to ECU in order to adjust the height to the aimed height selected by the height
select switch.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1786 /86 Heightselectswitchsignaldoesnotchange.
SHeightselectswitch
SHeightselectswitchcircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkoutputsignalofheightselectswitch.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check theheightselectswitchconditiondisplayedon thehand −held testerwhenpushing ”UP”and”DOWN”
button of the height select switch.
OK:

When ”UP” button is pushed: ”ON” is displayed for height select up switch condition.
When ”DOWN” button is pushed: ”ON” is displayed for height select down switch condition.

INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals DNSW and UPSW of

suspension control ECU connector and body ground
when”DOWN”and”UP”buttonofheightselectswitch is
pushed.

OK:

Terminal Switch condition Voltage

DNSW B d d
”DOWN” button pushed 9 − 14V

DNSW − Bodyground
”UP” button pushed Below 1.5 V

UPSW B d d
”UP” button pushed 9 − 14V

UPSW − Bodyground
”DOWN”buttonpushed Below1.5V

OK No problem.

NG



F05740

”UP” Button

”DOWN” Button

56

8

Suspension
Control
Switch

Height
Select
Switch

−DIAGNOSTICS ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

DI−277

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

2 Check height select switch.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the suspension control switch.
(b) Disconnect the suspension control switch (for height se-

lect switch) connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 5, 6 and 8 of suspen-
sion control switch (for height select switch) connector when
”UP” and ”DOWN” button of the height select switch is pushed.
OK:

Terminal Switch condition Resistance

5 8
”UP” button pushed 0 � (Continuity)

5 − 8
”DOWN” button pushed � � �Open)

6 8
”DOWN” button pushed 0 � (Continuity)

6 − 8
”UP” button pushed � � �Open)

NG Replace suspension control switch.

OK

3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between height
select switch and suspension control ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace suspension control ECU.


